Connecticut, session 2026, HB05355.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 16a-41a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall implement a program
to purchase deliverable fuel for low-income households participating in
the Connecticut energy assistance program and the state-appropriated
fuel assistance program. The commissioner shall ensure an adequate
supply of vendors for the program by (1) establishing [county and]
regional pricing standards for deliverable fuel, (2) reimbursing fuel
providers based on the price of the fuel publicly posted by the
commissioner on the Internet web site of the Department of Social
Services on the date of delivery, and (3) allowing a vendor to
electronically submit an authorized fuel slip or invoice for payment.
Commencing with the energy assistance program period beginning
November 1, 2025, the commissioner shall ensure an adequate supply
LCO No. 681 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5355
of vendors for the program by establishing new pricing standards for
deliverable fuel that fairly compensate fuel vendors for costs incurred
on fuel purchase and delivery while maintaining the maximum amount
of funding to benefit recipients of the program. Not later than August 1,
2025, the commissioner shall include such pricing standards in the
annual plan for the program required pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 16a-41a(b)